Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1613.01
Certification by county official to Property Tax Administrator; contents.

The county assessor or county clerk shall certify to the Property Tax Administrator, on or before December 1 of each year, the total taxable valuation and the Certificate of Taxes Levied. The certificate shall be used for statistical purposes and shall specify the information necessary to determine the total taxable value, tax levies, and total property taxes requested by the political subdivisions for the current year on forms prescribed and furnished by the Tax Commissioner. The certificate shall include for each political subdivision a statement of the amount of property taxes sought and the tax levy made for (1) the payment of principal or interest on bonds issued by the political subdivision and (2) all other purposes.

Laws 1913, c. 173, § 1, p. 525;

R.S.1913, § 6389;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. VI, § 15, p. 560;

C.S.1922, § 5853;

C.S.1929, § 77-515;

R.S.1943, § 77-628;

Laws 1949, c. 227, § 3, p. 632;

Laws 1951, c. 259, § 2, p. 885;

Laws 1965, c. 478, § 4, p. 1541;

Laws 1983, LB 193, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 268, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-628;

Laws 1989, Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 829, § 10;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 172;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 159;

Laws 1996, LB 1362, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 50;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 28;

Laws 2001, LB 275, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 80.